California, session 20252026, AB974.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14197.8 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14197.8. (a) In the case of a Medi-Cal enrollee of a Medi-Cal managed care plan who also has other health care coverage and for whom the Medi-Cal program is a payer of last resort, the department shall ensure that a provider that is not contracted with the Medi-Cal managed care plan and that is billing the Medi-Cal managed care plan for Medi-Cal allowable costs not paid by the other health care coverage does not face administrative requirements significantly in excess of the administrative requirements for billing those same costs to the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system.(b) (1) In the case of a Medi-Cal enrollee of a Medi-Cal managed care plan who also has other health care coverage, excluding Medicare, and for whom the Medi-Cal program is a payer of last resort, a provider participating in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system shall not be required to contract as an in-network provider with the Medi-Cal managed care plan in order to bill the Medi-Cal managed care plan for Medi-Cal allowable costs for covered health care services.(2) A Medi-Cal managed care plan may require a letter of agreement, or a similar agreement, under either of the following circumstances:(A) If a covered service requires prior authorization, or if a service is not covered by the other health care coverage but is a covered service under the Medi-Cal managed care plan, the Medi-Cal managed care plan may require a letter of agreement, or a similar agreement, with a provider that is not contracted with the Medi-Cal managed care plan for the provision of that service. Without a letter of agreement, or a similar agreement, the provider may be responsible for billed amounts for any services that exceed the allowable Medi-Cal fee-for-service rate or any applicable limitations on the number or duration of services provided. Pursuant to Section 14019.4, the provider shall not bill a Medi-Cal enrollee of a Medi-Cal managed care plan for any excess amounts not paid by the Medi-Cal managed care plan.(B) If a Medi-Cal enrollee of a Medi-Cal managed care plan requires a covered service and meets the requirements for continuity of care or the completion of covered services through a Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to Section 1373.96 of the Health and Safety Code, the Medi-Cal managed care plan may require a provider to enter into an agreement for the provision of the applicable services.(c) (1) The department shall solicit input from stakeholders, including consumer advocates, Medi-Cal managed care plans, other commercial plans, and, to the extent that information is available to the department, providers that serve regional center clients, regarding the coordination of payment for services between Medi-Cal enrollees’ other commercial health care coverage and their Medi-Cal managed care plans, with a specific emphasis on Medi-Cal recipients who receive regional center services. The department shall also include an item on the agenda of the first meeting of the Medi-Cal Managed Care Advisory Committee of 2026 to discuss this topic. After receiving stakeholder input, the department shall, within six months of the meeting, take the actions that it deems necessary to provide clarification regarding the conditions for billing Medi-Cal managed care plans to providers that render services to Medi-Cal managed care enrollees who also have other health care coverage. The department’s actions may include updating regulations, providing revised guidance to plans and providers, increasing reporting requirements, and taking enforcement action as it deems necessary.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department offer educational resources to an enrollee of a Medi-Cal managed care plan who needs assistance with understanding continuity of care and coordinating Medi-Cal and their other health care coverage when requested by the enrollee.(d) On an annual basis, from 2026 through 2029, the department shall update the Assembly Committee on Health and the Senate Committee on Health on the effectiveness of implementing this section.(e) For purposes of this section “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, information notices, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.(g) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that would exempt, from mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan, dual eligible and non-dual-eligible beneficiaries who receive services from a regional center and who use a Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system as a secondary form of health care coverage.